Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,217
Appeal; procedure.

Any appeal of an action taken or as a result of a hearing held pursuant to section 77-27,216 shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 32.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.